Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.100

Records open to public inspection—Certified copies.

All plans, specifications, estimates, and copies of accounts or records and all certificates attached thereto shall, when filed, become public records and shall at all reasonable times be subject to public inspection.

Certified copies of any estimate, account or record shall be furnished by the officer having the custody thereof to any person on demand and the payment of the legal fees for making and certifying the same.

[ 1923 c 183 s 9; RRS s 10322-9.]